Washington statutes.
RCW 18.195.010

Findings—Intent.

The legislature finds that in the newly reformed health care delivery system it is necessary to clarify providers' roles to ensure that they are working together to maximize patient access while controlling costs. This is especially important in the vision care industry, where the potential for confusion exists due to some overlapping scopes of practice among licensed providers.

The legislature finds that boards regulating health care professions should be mindful of the necessary balance between public safety and access to affordable care, and adopt rules that are consistent with their legislative intent. The risk that this balance may be lost is especially high in the optical industry, where competitive pressures have led to the involvement of the federal trade commission. The legislature recognizes its role in ensuring appropriate access to vision care for state residents by clarifying necessary prescription content and ensuring prescription release to the patient.

[ 1994 c 106 s 1.]